Arkansas, session 2025, HB1847.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 117, is amended to add an
additional section to read as follows:
23-117-103. Self-exclusion list — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "self-exclusion" or "self-excluded" means
a declaration from an individual to a casino that he or she would like to be
excluded from entering the casino's facility.
(b)(1) At the discretion of the Director of the Arkansas Racing
Commission, the Arkansas Racing Commission may also maintain a statewide
self-exclusion list, and the commission shall:
(A) Join a multi-state or national self-exclusion program
operated to ensure responsible gaming services; or
(B) Enter into an agreement with another state or states
for the sharing and mutual enforcement of each state's respective self-
exclusion list.
(2) The self-exclusion list maintained under subdivision (b)(1)
*CRH279*
04-14-2025 18:12:12 CRH279

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 S4/14/25 HB1847
of this section shall serve as the definitive list of self-excluded
individuals in lieu of a separate list maintained by each casino to comply
with rules regarding a casino's obligations related to self-excluded
individuals.
(3) Information received by the commission for the self-
exclusion list under this section is confidential and is not subject to
examination or disclosure as public information under the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.
(c)(1) This section does not permit the commission or an entity
involved under subsection (b) of this section to disclose the name or
information of an individual on the self-exclusion list without the
individual's authorization.
(2) The self-exclusion list shall not be open to public
inspection.
(3) A casino or an employee of a casino shall not be liable to a
self-excluded individual or other person for harm, monetary or otherwise,
that may arise as a result of the disclosure or publication, other than a
willful and unlawful disclosure or publication, of the identify of a self-
excluded individual.
(d)(1) An individual on the self-exclusion list shall not collect in
any manner or proceeding any winnings or recover any losses arising as a
result of prohibited gaming activity.
(2) Solely for the purposes of this section, gaming activity
that results in a self-excluded individual obtaining money or a thing of
value from, or being owed any money or thing of value by, a casino is a fully
executed gambling transaction.
(e)(1) Money or a thing of value that has been obtained by or is owed
to an individual on the self-exclusion list by a casino as a result of wagers
made by the individual on the self-exclusion list is subject to forfeiture
following notice to the individual and an opportunity to be heard.
(2) An amount forfeited under subdivision (e)(1) of this section
shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund.
(f) Any cost associated with commission requirements under subsection
(b) of this section may be paid from an assessment paid by each casino or
from amounts forfeited under The Arkansas Casino Gaming Amendment of 2018,
Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 100.
04-14-2025 18:12:12 CRH279

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 S4/14/25 HB1847

(g)(1) An individual is not permitted to add an individual other than
himself or herself onto the self-exclusion list.
(2) A casino shall require an individual to present his or her
identification to confirm identity before placement on the self-exclusion
list.
(h) The commission shall promulgate rules to implement and enforce
this section, including without limitation rules concerning:
(1) The transition from a single-location self-exclusion list to
a statewide or broader self-exclusion list;
(2) An option for a self-excluded individual to select the state
with which the commission is authorized to share his or her information;
(3) A means for an individual to join a self-exclusion list in
multiple states using a single form; and
(4) A means for an individual to remove himself or herself from
the self-exclusion list.

/s/McAlindon


















04-14-2025 18:12:12 CRH279